Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1505
Acknowledgments; oaths; power to administer.

The register of deeds shall have power to take acknowledgments and administer oaths and to certify the same under his or her hand and official seal.

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 32, p. 377;

R.S.1913, § 5620;

C.S.1922, § 4947;

C.S.1929, § 26-1205;

R.S.1943, § 23-1505;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 4.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).